Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1502
County clerk ex officio register of deeds, when.

Unless a register of deeds is elected pursuant to section 32-518, the county clerk shall perform all the duties imposed by law upon the register of deeds and shall be ex officio register of deeds.

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 3, p. 364;

R.S.1913, § 5617;

C.S.1922, § 4944;

C.S.1929, § 26-1202;

R.S.1943, § 23-1502;

Laws 1989, LB 24, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 542.